Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
Gulf Coast Regional Wastewater Management Commission
[Repealed]

§§ 49-17-131 through 49-17-143.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1979, ch. 437, § 8, eff. March 30, 1980.

§49-17-131. [En Laws, 1979, ch. 437, § 1]

§49-17-133. [En Laws, 1979, ch. 437, § 2]

§49-17-135. [En Laws, 1979, ch. 437, § 3]

§49-17-137. [En Laws, 1979, ch. 437, § 4]

§49-17-139. [En Laws, 1979, ch. 437, § 5]

§49-17-141. [En Laws, 1979, ch. 437, § 6]

§49-17-143. [En Laws, 1979, ch. 437, § 7]